Texas, session 892, HB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter Z, Chapter 240, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 240.912 to read as follows: Sec. 240.912.  REGULATION OF IMPERVIOUS COVER IN UNINCORPORATED AREA. The commissioners court of a county may regulate impervious cover located in the unincorporated area of the county for the purpose of: (1)  protecting, mitigating, or reducing flood risk; (2)  promoting the development of flood projects, as defined by Section 15.531(2), Water Code; (3)  promoting drainage; or (4)  promoting nature-based features to reduce flooding. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.